prince/dictionaries/pt-BR.aff
SFX I N 217
SFX I   0       a        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       a       udar
SFX I   0       am       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       am       udar
SFX I   0       as       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       as       udar
SFX I   0       des      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       des       dar
SFX I   0       des       star
SFX I   0       des       udar
SFX I   0       ei       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ei       dar
SFX I   0       ei       star
SFX I   0       ei       udar
SFX I   0       eis      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       eis       dar
SFX I   0       eis       star
SFX I   0       eis       udar
SFX I   0       em       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       em       dar
SFX I   0       em       star
SFX I   0       em       udar
SFX I   0       emos     [ei]ar
SFX I   0       emos       dar
SFX I   0       emos       star
SFX I   0       emos       udar
SFX I   0       es       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       es       dar
SFX I   0       es       star
SFX I   0       es       udar
SFX I   0       ia       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ia       dar
SFX I   0       ia       star
SFX I   0       ia       udar
SFX I   0       iam      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       iam       dar
SFX I   0       iam       star
SFX I   0       iam       udar
SFX I   0       ias      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ias       dar
SFX I   0       ias       star
SFX I   0       ias       udar
SFX I   0       mos      [ei]ar
SFX I   0       mos       dar
SFX I   0       mos       star
SFX I   0       mos       udar
SFX I   0       á        [ei]ar
SFX I   0       á       dar
SFX I   0       á       star
SFX I   0       á       udar
SFX I   0       ás       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ás       dar
SFX I   0       ás       star
SFX I   0       ás       udar
SFX I   0       ão       [ei]ar
SFX I   0       ão       dar
SFX I   0       ão       star
SFX I   0       ão       udar
SFX I   0       íamos    [ei]ar
SFX I   0       íamos       dar
SFX I   0       íamos       star
SFX I   0       íamos       udar
SFX I   0       íeis     [ei]ar
SFX I   0       íeis       dar
SFX I   0       íeis       star
SFX I   0       íeis       udar
SFX I   ar      ei       dar
SFX I   ar      ei       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ei       udar
SFX I   ar      eis       dar
SFX I   ar      eis      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      eis       udar
SFX I   ar      eja       star
SFX I   ar      ejais       star
SFX I   ar      ejam       star
SFX I   ar      ejamos       star
SFX I   ar      ejas       star
SFX I   ar      emos       dar
SFX I   ar      emos       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      emos       udar
SFX I   ar      er       dar
SFX I   ar      era       dar
SFX I   ar      eram       dar
SFX I   ar      eras       dar
SFX I   ar      erdes       dar
SFX I   ar      erem       dar
SFX I   ar      eres       dar
SFX I   ar      ermos       dar
SFX I   ar      esse       dar
SFX I   ar      essem       dar
SFX I   ar      esses       dar
SFX I   ar      este       dar
SFX I   ar      estes       dar
SFX I   ar      eu       dar
SFX I   ar      eve       star
SFX I   ar      ia       ear
SFX I   ar      iam       ear
SFX I   ar      ias       ear
SFX I   ar      ie       ear
SFX I   ar      iem       ear
SFX I   ar      ies       ear
SFX I   ar      io       ear
SFX I   ar      ive       star
SFX I   ar      ivemos       star
SFX I   ar      iver       star
SFX I   ar      ivera       star
SFX I   ar      iveram       star
SFX I   ar      iveras       star
SFX I   ar      iverdes       star
SFX I   ar      iverem       star
SFX I   ar      iveres       star
SFX I   ar      ivermos       star
SFX I   ar      ivesse       star
SFX I   ar      ivessem       star
SFX I   ar      ivesses       star
SFX I   ar      iveste       star
SFX I   ar      ivestes       star
SFX I   ar      ivéramos       star
SFX I   ar      ivéreis       star
SFX I   ar      ivésseis       star
SFX I   ar      ivéssemos       star
SFX I   ar      ou       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ou       dar
SFX I   ar      ou       star
SFX I   ar      ou       udar
SFX I   ar      á       dar
SFX I   ar      á       star
SFX I   ar      áramos      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áramos       udar
SFX I   ar      áreis       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áreis       udar
SFX I   ar      ás       dar
SFX I   ar      ás       star
SFX I   ar      ásseis      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ásseis       udar
SFX I   ar      ássemos     [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ássemos       udar
SFX I   ar      ávamos      [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      ávamos       dar
SFX I   ar      ávamos       star
SFX I   ar      ávamos       udar
SFX I   ar      áveis       [ei]ar
SFX I   ar      áveis       dar
SFX I   ar      áveis       star
SFX I   ar      áveis       udar
SFX I   ar      ão       dar
SFX I   ar      ão       star
SFX I   ar      éramos       dar
SFX I   ar      éreis       dar
SFX I   ar      ésseis       dar
SFX I   ar      éssemos       dar
SFX I   ar      ê       dar
SFX I   ar      êem       dar
SFX I   ar      ês       dar
SFX I   iar     eia       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eiam       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eias       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eie       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eiem       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eies       [^]iar
SFX I   iar     eio       [^]iar
SFX I   oiar    óia       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óiam       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óias       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óie       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óiem       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óies       oiar
SFX I   oiar    óio       oiar
SFX I   r       do       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       do       dar
SFX I   r       do       star
SFX I   r       do       udar
SFX I   r       i        [ei]ar
SFX I   r       i       dar
SFX I   r       i       star
SFX I   r       i       udar
SFX I   r       is       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       is       dar
SFX I   r       is       star
SFX I   r       is       udar
SFX I   r       mos      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       mos       dar
SFX I   r       mos       star
SFX I   r       mos       udar
SFX I   r       ndo      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ndo       dar
SFX I   r       ndo       star
SFX I   r       ndo       udar
SFX I   r       sse      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       sse       udar
SFX I   r       ssem     [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ssem       udar
SFX I   r       sses     [ei]ar
SFX I   r       sses       udar
SFX I   r       ste      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       ste       udar
SFX I   r       stes     [ei]ar
SFX I   r       stes       udar
SFX I   r       va       [ei]ar
SFX I   r       va       dar
SFX I   r       va       star
SFX I   r       va       udar
SFX I   r       vam      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       vam       dar
SFX I   r       vam       star
SFX I   r       vam       udar
SFX I   r       vas      [ei]ar
SFX I   r       vas       dar
SFX I   r       vas       star
SFX I   r       vas       udar
SFX I   udar    úda       udar
SFX I   udar    údam       udar
SFX I   udar    údas       udar
SFX I   udar    úde       udar
SFX I   udar    údem       udar
SFX I   udar    údes       udar
SFX I   udar    údo        udar

# IRREGULARES: ser (era, és, for) ter haver ir (vá) poder querer
