prince/dictionaries/pt-BR.dic
aformosear/I
alardear/I
alhear/I
altear/I
amiudar/I
ansiar/I
apartear/I
apear/I
aperrear/I
apoiar/I
arquear/I
arrear/I
arroxear/I
assear/I
assenhorear/I
assorear/I
atear/I
balancear/I
balear/I
bambear/I
bambolear/I
bandear/I
banquetear/I
baquear/I
baratear/I
barbear/I
basear/I
bloquear/I
bobear/I
bombardear/I
bombear/I
borboletear/I
boxear/I
branquear/I
bronquear/I
bronzear/I
bruxulear/I
bundear/I
cabecear/I
cacetear/I
cachear/I
calotear/I
cambalear/I
campear/I
capitanear/I
cear/I
chacotear/I
charlatanear/I
chasquear/I
chatear/I
chavear/I
chicotear/I
chilrear/I
chulear/I
clarear/I
contrabandear/I
crasear/I
custear/I
dar/I
delinear/I
desbloquear/I
desencadear/I
desenfrear/I
desnortear/I
despentear/I
devanear/I
empestear/I
encadear/I
enlamear/I
enxamear/I
esbofetear/I
escamotear/I
escassear/I
esfaquear/I
esfomear/I
espernear/I
esporear/I
estar/I
estontear/I
estrondear/I
falsear/I
fanfarrear/I
farrear/I
flautear/I
florear/I
folhear/I
franquear/I
frasear/I
frear/I
fundear/I
galantear/I
galhardear/I
gazetear/I
golear/I
golpear/I
gorjear/I
grampear/I
granjear/I
guerrear/I
hastear/I
homenagear/I
incendiar/I
intermear/I
intermediar/I
laurear/I
lisonjear/I
lotear/I
manear/I
manusear/I
mapear/I
massagear/I
mediar/I
menear/I
metamorfosear/I
mimosear/I
nocautear/I
nomear/I
nortear/I
odiar/I
ombrear/I
ondear/I
pajear/I
palavrear/I
papaguear/I
parafrasear/I
passear/I
pastorear/I
patentear/I
pavonear/I
pentear/I
pigarrear/I
pinotear/I
pisotear/I
pleitear/I
prantear/I
presentear/I
rarear/I
rastrear/I
ratear/I
recrear/I
refrear/I
regatear/I
renomear/I
rodear/I
romancear/I
saborear/I
saltear/I
sanear/I
saquear/I
saracotear/I
saudar/I
semear/I
sombrear/I
sortear/I
sucatear/I
tapear/I
tartamudear/I
tatear/I
titubear/I
tornear/I
torpedear/I
tourear/I
trombetear/I
trotear/I
vagabundear/I
vaguear/I
veranear/I
